Illinois, session 104th, HB1533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 22B-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/22B-101)7    Sec. 22B-101. Establishment. The The Police Officers' 8Pension Investment Fund is created with authority to manage 9the reserves, funds, assets, securities, properties, and 10moneys of the police pension funds created pursuant to Article 113 of this Code, all as provided in this Article.12(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20.)